en: Sewing Machine Needles
xx: Sewing Machine Needles
cs: Jehly do šicích strojů
da: Symaskine – nåle
de: Nähmaschinennadeln
es: Agujas para máquinas de coser
fr: Aiguilles de machines à coudre
it: Aghi per macchine da cucire
ja: ミシン針
nl: Naaimachinenaalden
no: Symaskinnåler
pl: Igły do maszyn do szycia
pt: Agulhas para máquinas de costura
ru: Иглы для швейных машин
sv: Symaskinsnålar
tr: Dikiş Makinesi İğneleri

en: Safety Pins
xx: Safety Pins
cs: Spínací špendlíky
da: Sikkerhedsnåle
de: Sicherheitsnadeln
es: Imperdibles
fr: Épingles de sûreté
it: Spille di sicurezza
ja: 安全ピン
nl: Veiligheidsspelden
no: Sikkerhetsnåler
pl: Agrafki
pt: Alfinetes de segurança
ru: Английские булавки
sv: Säkerhetsnålar
tr: Çengelli İğneler

en: Straight Pins
xx: Straight Pins
cs: Špendlíky
da: Lige nåle
de: Stecknadeln
es: Alfileres
fr: Épingles droites
it: Spilli
ja: まち針
nl: Spelden
no: Rette nåler
pl: Szpilki
pt: Alfinetes
ru: Прямые булавки
sv: Knappnålar
tr: Toplu İğneler

en: Textile Craft Machines
xx: Textile Craft Machines
cs: Hobby textilní stroje
da: Maskiner til tekstilarbejde
de: Maschinen für Textilarbeiten
es: Máquinas textiles
fr: Machines pour confections textiles
it: Macchine per tessili
ja: 織物工芸機械
nl: Textielbewerkingsmachines
no: Maskiner til tekstilhåndverk
pl: Urządzenia do tekstyliów
pt: Máquinas têxteis para artesanato
ru: Устройства для работы с текстилем
sv: Hobbymaskiner för textilier
tr: Kumaş El İşi Makineleri

en: Felting Needles & Machines
xx: Felting Needles & Machines
cs: Jehly na filcování
da: Filtepinde
de: Filznadeln & -maschinen
es: Máquinas y agujas para enfurtido
fr: Aiguilles et machines à feutrer
it: Macchine e aghi per feltratura
ja: 羊毛フェルト用針
nl: Viltnaalden
no: Filtnåler og maskiner
pl: Igły do filcowania
pt: Agulhas de feltragem
ru: Иглы для валяния
sv: Filtningsnålar
tr: Keçe İğneleri ve Makineleri

en: Hand Looms
xx: Hand Looms
cs: Ruční stavy
da: Håndvæve
de: Handwebstühle
es: Telares a mano
fr: Métiers à tisser manuels
it: Telai a mano
ja: 手動織機
nl: Handweefgetouwen
no: Håndvever
pl: Krosna ręczne
pt: Teares manuais
ru: Ручные ткацкие станки
sv: Handvävstolar
tr: El Dokuma Tezgahları

en: Mechanical Looms
xx: Mechanical Looms
cs: Mechanické stavy
da: Maskinvæve
de: Mechanische Webstühle
es: Telares mecánicos
fr: Métiers à tisser mécaniques
it: Telai meccanici
ja: 機械織機
nl: Weefmachines
no: Mekaniske vever
pl: Krosna mechaniczne
pt: Teares mecânicos
ru: Механические ткацкие станки
sv: Mekaniska vävstolar
tr: Mekanik Dokuma Tezgahları

en: Sewing Machines
xx: Sewing Machines
cs: Šicí stroje
da: Symaskiner
de: Nähmaschinen
es: Máquinas de coser
fr: Machines à coudre, Machine à coudre
it: Macchine da cucire
ja: ミシン
nl: Naaimachines
no: Symaskiner
pl: Maszyny do szycia
pt: Máquinas de costura
ru: Швейные машины
sv: Symaskiner
tr: Dikiş Makineleri

en: Spinning Wheels
xx: Spinning Wheels
cs: Kolovrátky
da: Spinderok
de: Spinnräder
es: Ruecas
fr: Rouets
it: Filatoi
ja: 糸車
nl: Spinnewielen
no: Rokker
pl: Kołowrotki przędzalnicze
pt: Rodas de fiar
ru: Прялки
sv: Spinnrockar
tr: Çıkrıklar

en: Thimbles & Sewing Palms
xx: Thimbles & Sewing Palms
cs: Náprstky
da: Fingerbøl
de: Fingerhüte
es: Dedales y protectores de mano para coser
fr: Dés à coudre et paumelles
it: Ditali e protezioni per cucito
ja: 指貫
nl: Vingerhoeden
no: Fingerbøler og håndbeskyttelse
pl: Naparstki krawieckie
pt: Dedais
ru: Напёрстки
sv: Fingerborgar
tr: Yüksükler ve Dikiş Eldivenleri

en: Sewing Palms
xx: Sewing Palms
cs: Kryty dlaně na šití
da: Syhandsker
de: Nähhände
es: Protectores de mano
fr: Dés à coudre pour paume de la main
it: Protezioni per cucito
ja: ソーイングパーム
nl: Naaihandschoenen
no: Seilmakerhansker
pl: Nakładki na dłoń
pt: Protetor de mãos para costura
ru: Защитные накладки на руку для шитья
sv: Syhandskar
tr: Dikiş Eldivenleri

en: Thimbles
xx: Thimbles
cs: Náprstky na šití
da: Fingerbøl til håndarbejde
de: Nähringe
es: Dedales
fr: Dés à coudre
it: Ditali
ja: 指ぬき
nl: Vingerhoedjes
no: Fingerbøll
pl: Naparstki
pt: Dedal
ru: Защитные колпачки для пальцев
sv: Fingerborgar och syhandskar
tr: Yüksükler

en: Thread & Yarn Tools
xx: Thread & Yarn Tools
cs: Nástroje na nitě a příze
da: Værktøjer til tråd og garn
de: Werkzeuge für die Faden- & Garnverarbeitung
es: Herramientas para hilar y tejer
fr: Outils pour fil et laine
it: Strumenti per filati
ja: 糸関連用具
nl: Gereedschap voor draad en garen
no: Verktøy til tråd og garn
pl: Narzędzia do nici i przędzy
pt: Ferramentas para linhas e fios
ru: Инструменты для работы с пряжей и нитями
sv: Tråd- och garnverktyg
tr: İplik ve Yün Araçları

en: Fiber Cards & Brushes
xx: Fiber Cards & Brushes
cs: Česačky na vlnu
da: Fiberkort
de: Kardierer
es: Cepillos y cardas para fibras
fr: Cardeuses et brosses à laine
it: Cardalana
ja: ドラムカーダー
nl: Wolkammen en hekels
no: Fiberkort og -børster
pl: Zgrzeblarki
pt: Cartões de fibra
ru: Чесальные инструменты и машины
sv: Kardor
tr: Fiber Kartlar ve Fırçalar

en: Hand Spindles
xx: Hand Spindles
cs: Ruční vřetena
da: Håndtene
de: Handspindeln
es: Husos de mano
fr: Fuseaux
it: Fusi manuali
ja: ハンドスピンドル
nl: Handspinners
no: Håndteiner
pl: Wrzeciona ręczne
pt: Bilros
ru: Веретена
sv: Handsländor
tr: İğler

en: Needle Threaders
xx: Needle Threaders
cs: Navlékače nití
da: Nåletrådere
de: Nadeleinfädler
es: Enhebradores de agujas
fr: Enfile-aiguilles
it: Infilatori
ja: 糸通し
nl: Draaddoorhalers
no: Verktøy for å træ i nåler
pl: Nawlekacze do nici
pt: Passadores de linha
ru: Нитевдеватели
sv: Nålpåträdare
tr: İplik Geçiriciler

en: Thread & Yarn Guides
xx: Thread & Yarn Guides
cs: Vodiče nití a příze
da: Tråd og garn – guide
de: Faden- & Garnführer
es: Guías para hilo y lana
fr: Guides de fil et de laine
it: Guide per filati
ja: 糸道
nl: Draad- en garengeleiders
no: Tråd- og garnledere
pl: Prowadnice nici i przędzy
pt: Guias de linha e fios
ru: Направляющие для нитей и пряжи
sv: Tråd- och garnledare
tr: İplik ve Yün İpliği Kılavuzları

en: Thread & Yarn Spools
xx: Thread & Yarn Spools
cs: Špulky na nitě a přízi
da: Tråd og garn – spoler
de: Faden- & Garnspulen
es: Carretes de hilo y lana
fr: Bobines pour fil et laine
it: Rocchetti per filati
ja: 糸巻き
nl: Draad- en garenspoelen
no: Tråd- og garnspoler
pl: Szpulki do nici i przędzy
pt: Carretéis de linha e fios
ru: Катушки для нитей и пряжи
sv: Tråd- och garnspolar
tr: İplik ve Yün İpliği Makaraları

en: Thread\, Yarn & Bobbin Winders
xx: Thread\, Yarn & Bobbin Winders
cs: Navíječe nití a příze
da: Tråd og garn – vikleapparat
de: Faden- & Garnwickler
es: Bobinadoras de hilo y lana
fr: Enrouleurs de fil\, bobinoirs et pelotonneuses
it: Arcolai e dipanatori per filati
ja: 糸巻き器
nl: Draad- en garenwinders
no: Tråd-\, garn- og snelleviklere
pl: Nawijarki do nici i przędzy
pt: Bobinadores de linha e fios
ru: Моталки для нитей и пряжи
sv: Tråd- och garnlindare
tr: İplik\, Yün İpliği ve Makara Sarma Aletleri

en: Weaving Beaters
xx: Weaving Beaters
cs: Tkalcovské hřebeny
da: Vævning – kamme
de: Webschlagkämme
es: Peine de tejer
fr: Battoirs à tapisserie
it: Pettini per telaio
ja: 織物用ビーター
nl: Aanslagkammen
no: Vevkammer
pl: Bidła
pt: Batedores de tecelagem
ru: Ткацкие трепала
sv: Vävskedar
tr: Dokuma Tokmakları